Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LUNDSTRUM CENTER.new text end new text begin $7,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Lundstrum Center for the Performing Arts, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, for the predesign, design, and construction of teaching spaces and a new theater to serve the youth and community members of North Minneapolis and surrounding areas. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end